Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 2. Aid for Operation Deficits of Community Operated Nonprofit Hospitals and Clinics.

Sec. 18.25.040.
Department to render aid.

The department may assist in cases of operational deficits of community operated nonprofit hospitals and clinics in the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 96 SLA 1949)

Sec. 18.25.050.
Determination of necessity.

The department shall initiate appropriate action in accordance with the provisions of AS

18.25.040

—

18.25.060

as soon as the department determines which projects are of most immediate necessity.

History.

(§ 2 ch 96 SLA 1949)

Sec. 18.25.060.
Intent.

It is the intent of AS

18.25.040

—

18.25.060

to provide financial aid, or funds to match available federal funds to aid localities or municipalities whose taxable values are limited in scope and for whom an attempt at community financing of a community operated nonprofit hospital or clinic would entail insurmountable hardship.

History.

(§ 3 ch 96 SLA 1949)